Massachusetts, session 194th, H5003.
Be it enacted by the People, and by their authority, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 50 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
amending the definition of “Political party” therein by inserting after the phrase “to a party 
which at” in the first sentence thereof the phrase “the latest state primary held prior to”, and by 
striking the second sentence thereof in its entirety. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 50 of the General laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
Section 2 the following Section 2A:- 
Section 2A. In state primaries held in accordance with sections forty-one to fifty-three A, 
inclusive, of chapter fifty-three, the two persons receiving the highest number of votes for an 
office shall be deemed nominated for election to such office and shall be the only persons whose 
names shall be printed on the ballot for such office at the next proceeding state election. 
SECTION 3. Section 2 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting the phrase “Except as provided in section two-A of chapter fifty,” at the beginning of 
the second sentence thereof. 

of 9 14 SECTION 4. Section 6 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking 
from said Section 6 the first two sentences of the first paragraph thereof, and the second and third 
paragraphs thereof in their entirety. 
SECTION 5. Section 8 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking 
from said Section 8 the first three sentences of the first paragraph thereof, and the first and fourth 
sentences of the second paragraph thereof. 
SECTION 6. Section 10 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the first four sentences from the first paragraph of said Section 10 and inserting in place 
thereof the following:- 
All certificates of nomination and nomination papers of candidates for offices for which state 
primaries are held in accordance with section forty-one, shall be filed in accordance with section 
forty-six. 
SECTION 7. Section 14 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word “otherwise” in the first sentence thereof the following:- 
shall first be filled by the candidate who received the next highest number of votes for such 
office in the applicable state primary, and if there is no such candidate, 
SECTION 8. Section 33 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking said Section 33 and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
Section 33. At least three facsimile copies of the ballot shall be provided for each polling place 
as specimen ballots. 

of 9 34 SECTION 9. Section 34 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking from the first sentence thereof the phrase “Official ballot of the (here shall follow the 
party name)” and inserting in place thereof the phrase “Official primary ballot”, and by inserting 
following the first paragraph thereof the following:- 
Against the name of each such candidate there shall be printed the political party or designation 
reflected on their nomination papers, as provided in section forty-five and, upon the joint request 
of the general or executive committee representing a political party or designation and such 
candidate, the words "Endorsed by the [name of political party or designation]". In the latter 
case, the request must be filed with the state secretary not less than fifteen days prior to the latest 
date by which ballots must be printed. 
SECTION 10. Section 37 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking from the first paragraph thereof the first sentence in its entirety, the phrases “Except as 
provided by section thirty-seven A,” and “, and, if the party enrolment of such voter is shown on 
the voting list, the name of the party in which he is enrolled” from the second sentence thereof, 
the third sentence in its entirety, the phrase “of the political party so requested” from the fourth 
sentence thereof, and the fifth sentence in its entirety, and from the second paragraph thereof the 
second and third sentences in their entirety. 
SECTION 11. Section 41 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the phrase “of political parties” from the first sentence thereof. 
SECTION 12. Section 44 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the last sentence thereof and inserting in place thereof the following:- 

of 9 55 In the case of the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, only nomination papers containing 
the names and addresses of candidates for both offices shall be valid. 
SECTION 13. Section 45 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the phrase “the political party whose nomination he seeks” in the first sentence thereof, 
and inserting in place thereof the phrase “the political party or designation that he represents, if 
any, as determined by his voter registration”, and by striking the fourth paragraph thereof and 
inserting in place thereof the following:- 
No nomination paper for use in the nomination of candidates to be voted for at state primaries 
shall contain the name of more than one candidate, except that nomination papers for candidates 
for governor and lieutenant governor shall contain the name of one candidate for each office. 
Such nomination papers for candidates for governor and lieutenant governor shall contain 
provision for the names and addresses of members of a committee of five registered voters who 
shall fill any vacancy caused by death, withdrawal, ineligibility or disqualification of either 
candidate. 
SECTION 14. Section 46 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the phrase “and who are not enrolled in any other party than that whose nomination the 
candidate seeks,” from the fifth sentence thereof. 
SECTION 15. Section 53 of Chapter 53 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking said Section 53 and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
Section 53. In case of a tie vote where the number of persons receiving equal votes exceeds the 
number of nominations available, the state secretary shall forthwith summon the candidates who 

of 9 76 have received the tie votes to appear before them at a time and place to be designated by them. 
The state secretary shall at that time and place break the tie by lot. 
SECTION 16. Section 33 of Chapter 54 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the phrase “and elections and of voting for candidates of more than one political party at 
a primary” from the first paragraph thereof, striking the final sentence of the second paragraph 
thereof, and striking the phrase “or of voting for candidates of more than one political party at a 
primary” from the third paragraph thereof,  
SECTION 17. Section 43A of Chapter 54 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the phrase “at a state election” from the first sentence thereof. 
SECTION 18. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2028. 
SECTION 19. The provisions of this act are severable, and if any clause, sentence, 
paragraph or section of this law or an application thereof shall be adjudged by any court of 
competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the 
remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation the clause, sentence, paragraph, section 
or application adjudged invalid and such clause, sentence, paragraph, section or application shall 
be reformed and construed so that it would be valid to the maximum extent permitted.
 
 

of 9 FIRST TEN SIGNERS 
NAME RESIDENCE CITY OR TOWN 
Danielle Susan Allen 102 Otis Street, #2 Cambridge 
Kerry Murphy Healey 10 Curtis Point Beverly 
Philip John 
Edmundson 55 Cottage Street Hingham 
Nathan James 
Lockwood 91 Main Street Lunenburg 
Jennifer Ann Nassour 12 Mountview Road Wellesley 
Elizabeth S. Bradt 22 Larchmont Road Salem 
Richard Jeffrey Lyman 41 Turkey Shore Road Ipswich 
Vivian Birchall 16 Wampus Avenue, #14 Acton 
Kate Kavanagh 409 Old Bedford Road Concord 
Kevin Pitney Johnson 131 Windsor Road Newton 
  

of 9  
CERTIFICATE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. 
 
 
            September 3, 2025. 
 
 
 
Honorable William Francis Galvin 
Secretary of the Commonwealth 
One Ashburton Place, Room 1705 
Boston, Massachusetts 02108 
 
 
Re: Initiative Petition No. 25-12:  Initiative Petition for a Law to Implement 
All-Party State Primaries – Version B 
 
 
Dear Secretary Galvin: 
 
In accordance with the provisions of Article 48 of the Amendments to 
the Massachusetts Constitution, I have reviewed the above-referenced initiative 
petition, which was submitted to me on or before the first Wednesday of August 
of this year. 
 
I hereby certify that this measure is in proper form for submission to 
the people; that the measure is not, either affirmatively or negatively, 
substantially the same as any measure which has been qualified for submission 
or submitted to the people at either of the two preceding biennial state elections; 
and that it contains only subjects that are related or are mutually dependent and 
which are not excluded from the initiative process pursuant to Article 48, the 
Initiative, Part 2, Section 2. 
 
In accordance with Article 48, I enclose a fair, concise summary of the 
measure. 
 
 
Sincerely, 
 
ANDREA JOY CAMPBELL 
Attorney General. 

of 9 SUMMARY OF 25-12 
This proposed law would eliminate political party primaries for state elections and 
instead establish a system where there would be a single, all-party primary in which all 
candidates, regardless of their party affiliation, would be listed on one ballot, and voters could 
vote for any candidate on the ballot. The two candidates receiving the most votes in the primary 
would advance to the general election ballot. 
This proposed law would require candidates for governor and lieutenant governor to run 
and be listed jointly on the ballot in the primary. 
This proposed law would provide political party status to any group whose candidates for 
any statewide office received at least 3% of the ballots cast in the state primary.